Arkansas, session 2025, SB157.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Legislative intent.
It is the intent of the General Assembly that:
(1) This act provide a pension-owned life insurance policy as a
benefit to the members of the public employee retirement systems;
(2) The pension-owned life insurance policies for the members of
the respective state retirement systems be owned by each respective system
and provided to each member of the system;
(3) Each state retirement system has the ability to offer life
insurance as a survivor's benefit to each member;
(4) No state retirement system shall be required to offer this
benefit; and
(5) If life insurance is offered as a survivor's benefit to the
members of a state retirement system, the life insurance payment shall be a
*LJH098*
04-07-2025 21:41:26 LJH098

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 S4/2/25 H4/7/25 SB157
set amount paid to the member's beneficiary, less any overpayments, with the
remaining balance to be used to lessen the system's unfunded liabilities.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code Title 24, Chapter 4, Subchapter 6, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
24-4-624. Life insurance — Payment to beneficiary.
(a) The Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System may provide a
life insurance benefit to the beneficiary of a deceased member.
(b) The Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement
System shall promulgate rules to implement this section.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 24-5-116 is amended to add an additional
subsection to read as follows:
(e)(1) The Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System may
provide a life insurance benefit to the beneficiary of a deceased member.
(2) The Board of Trustees of the Arkansas State Highway
Employees' Retirement System shall promulgate rules to implement this
subdivision (e).

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code Title 24, Chapter 6, Subchapter 2, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
24-6-229. Life insurance — Payment to beneficiary.
(a) The State Police Retirement System may provide a life insurance
benefit to the beneficiary of a deceased member.
(b) The Board of Trustees of the State Police Retirement System shall
promulgate rules to implement this section.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code Title 24, Chapter 7, Subchapter 7, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
24-7-739. Life insurance — Payment to beneficiary.
(a) The Arkansas Teacher Retirement System may provide a life
insurance benefit to the beneficiary of a deceased member.
(b) The Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System
shall promulgate rules to implement this section.

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code Title 24, Chapter 8, Subchapter 2, is amended
04-07-2025 21:41:26 LJH098

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 S4/2/25 H4/7/25 SB157
to add an additional section to read as follows:
24-8-231. Life insurance — Payment to beneficiary.
(a) The Arkansas Judicial Retirement System may provide a life
insurance benefit to the beneficiary of a deceased member.
(b) The Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Judicial Retirement System
shall promulgate rules to implement this section.

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code Title 24, Chapter 10, Subchapter 6, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
24-10-621. Life insurance — Payment to beneficiary.
(a) The Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System may provide a
life insurance benefit to the beneficiary of a deceased member.
(b) The Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Local Police and Fire
Retirement System shall promulgate rules to implement this section.

/s/J. Dotson




















04-07-2025 21:41:26 LJH098